California statutes. Civil Code
(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the management shall not be required to obtain a tax clearance certificate, as set forth in Section 5832 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to dispose of an abandoned mobilehome and its contents pursuant to subdivision (f). However, any sale pursuant to this section shall be subject to the registration requirements of Section 18100.5 of the Health and Safety Code and the tax clearance certificate requirements of Section 18092.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, forms and procedures made available for the implementation of Chapter 376 of the Statutes of 2015 shall not be subject to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 3.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

798.62.

(a) If a mobilehome park is destroyed as a result of a wildfire or other natural disaster, and management elects to rebuild the park at the same location, management shall offer a renewed tenancy in the rebuilt mobilehome park to all previous homeowners in accordance with the following:

(1) The offer of renewed tenancy shall be on substantially the same terms as the previous homeowner’s rental agreement that was in existence at the time of the wildfire or other natural disaster. However, management may adjust terms in the previous rental agreement to reflect costs and expenses to rebuild the park that were incurred from the time of the disaster until management received a final certificate of occupancy for all spaces in the park. These costs and
 expenses may include, but are not limited to, costs associated with demolition, reconstruction, and environmental remediation, as well as taxes and interest expenses.

(2) Management shall provide the previous homeowner, upon request, a statement listing the costs and expenses incurred in rebuilding the park and how the costs and expenses relate to the adjustment of terms in the rental agreement.

(3) The offer shall include an application to accept the renewed tenancy, the terms of the renewed tenancy, the deposit required to secure the renewed tenancy, and a clear statement of when the offer expires. 

(4) Management shall send each previous homeowner the offer by certified mail, at least 240 days before the park is reopened, to the last postal address for the previous homeowner known to management, which may be the
 previous homeowner’s former address within the park. If management has an email address or telephone number for the previous homeowner, management shall additionally attempt to notify the homeowner of the offer by those means.

(5) A previous homeowner may accept the offer by submitting, within 60 days from the date the homeowner receives the offer, the application and required deposit to secure the renewed tenancy to management and sign a rental agreement. If the previous homeowner fails to accept the offer within this time period, then the previous homeowner’s right to a renewed tenancy under this section is deemed forfeited.

(6) Management shall process applications for renewed tenancy on a first-come-first-served basis.

(7) The previous homeowner shall not transfer the right to a renewed tenancy. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “previous homeowner” means a homeowner with a valid tenancy in a mobilehome park at the time of a wildfire or other natural disaster.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.   (SB 274)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

798.64.

(a) (1) When a mobilehome tenancy is terminated due to damage or the destruction of the mobilehome park or any space as a result of a disaster, management shall return to the homeowner any advance rental payments received from the homeowner that cover any period of time after the date of the termination.

(2) Any payment required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made within 21 days of the date of the termination and shall be sent to the address provided by the homeowner. If the homeowner does not provide an address, mailings pursuant to this subdivision shall be sent to the address where the mobilehome was located.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the date of the termination shall be the date upon which the mobilehome park or the mobilehome space was damaged or destroyed.

(b) During any period that a homeowner is unable to occupy their mobilehome or mobilehome space due to a mandatory evacuation order pursuant to a disaster, the homeowner’s obligation to pay rent shall be discharged for the period during which the homeowner is required to be evacuated. If the homeowner has paid rent in advance for any portion of the evacuation period, management shall return that portion of prepaid rent to the homeowner within 10 calendar days after the evacuation order is lifted, or the homeowner may deduct that amount from the next month’s rent which becomes due and payable after the evacuation order
 is lifted.

(c) For purposes of this section, “disaster”
 means a natural or manmade emergency resulting from an earthquake, flood, fire, riot, storm, drought, plant or animal infestation or disease, pandemic or epidemic disease outbreak, or other natural or manmade disaster for which a state of emergency has been declared by the President of the United States or the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 547, Sec. 1.   (SB 610)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transfer of Mobilehome or Mobilehome Park [798.70. - 798.83.]

798.70.

(a) A homeowner, an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a mobilehome in the mobilehome park through the death of the owner of the mobilehome who was a homeowner at the time of his or her death, or the agent of any such person, may advertise the sale or exchange of his or her mobilehome, or, if not prohibited by the terms of an agreement with the management, may advertise the rental of his or her mobilehome, by
 displaying one sign in the window of the mobilehome, or by one sign posted on the side of the mobilehome facing the street, or by one sign in front of the mobilehome facing the street, stating that the mobilehome is for sale or exchange or, if not prohibited, for rent by the owner of the mobilehome or his or her agent. Any such person also may display one sign conforming to these requirements indicating that the mobilehome is on display for an “open house,” if allowed by the park. The park may allow open houses and may establish reasonable rules or regulations governing how an open house may be conducted, including rules regarding the number of houses allowed to be open at one time, hours, and parking. The sign shall state the name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the mobilehome or his or her agent and the sign face shall not exceed 24 inches in width and 36 inches in height. Signs posted in front of a mobilehome pursuant to this section may be of an H-frame, A-frame, L-frame, or generally
 accepted yard-arm type design with the sign face perpendicular to, but not extending into, the street. Management may require the use of a step-in L-frame sign. Homeowners may attach to the sign or their mobilehome tubes or holders for leaflets that provide information on the mobilehome for sale, exchange, or rent. 

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.   (SB 419)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

798.71.

(a) (1) The management may not show or list for sale a manufactured home or mobilehome without first obtaining the owner’s written authorization. The authorization shall specify the terms and conditions regarding the showing or listing.

(2) Management may require that a homeowner advise management in writing that his or her manufactured home or mobilehome is for sale. If
 management requires that a homeowner advise management in writing that his or her manufactured home or mobilehome is for sale, failure to comply with this requirement does not invalidate a transfer.

(b) The management shall prohibit neither the listing nor the sale of a manufactured home or mobilehome within the park by the homeowner, an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a manufactured home or mobilehome in the mobilehome park through the death of the owner of the manufactured home or mobilehome who was a homeowner at the time of his or her death, or the agent of any such person other than the management. For purposes of this section, “listing” includes advertising the address of the home to the general public.

(c) The management shall not require the selling homeowner, or an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the
 estate who gains ownership of a manufactured home or mobilehome in the mobilehome park through the death of the owner of the manufactured home or mobilehome who was a homeowner at the time of his or her death, to authorize the management or any other specified broker, dealer, or person to act as the agent in the sale of a manufactured home or mobilehome as a condition of resale of the home in the park or of management’s approval of the buyer or prospective homeowner for residency in the park.

(d) The management shall not require a homeowner, who is replacing a mobilehome or manufactured home on a space in the park, in which he or she resides, to use a specific broker, dealer, or other person as an agent in the purchase of or installation of the replacement home.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting the provisions of the Health and Safety Code governing the
 licensing of manufactured home or mobilehome salespersons or dealers. 

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 288, Sec. 4.   (SB 419)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

798.72.

(a) The management shall not charge a homeowner, an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a mobilehome in the mobilehome park through the death of the owner of the mobilehome who was a homeowner at the time of his or her death, or the agent of any such person a transfer or selling fee as a condition of a sale of his mobilehome within a park unless the management performs a service in the sale. The management shall not perform any such service in connection with the sale unless so requested, in writing, by the homeowner, an heir, joint
 tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a mobilehome in the mobilehome park through the death of the owner of the mobilehome who was a homeowner at the time of his or her death, or the agent of any such person.

(b) The management shall not charge a prospective homeowner or his or her agent, upon purchase of a mobilehome, a fee as a condition of approval for residency in a park unless the management performs a specific service in the sale. The management shall not impose a fee, other than for a credit check in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 798.74, for an interview of a prospective homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 745, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

798.73.

The management shall not require the removal of a mobilehome from the park in the event of the sale of the mobilehome to a third party during the term of the homeowner’s rental agreement or in the 60 days following the initial notice required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 798.55. However, in the event of a sale to a third party, in order to upgrade the quality of the park, the management may require that a mobilehome be removed from the park where:

(a) It is not a
 “mobilehome” within the meaning of Section 798.3.

(b) It is more than 20 years old, or more than 25 years old if manufactured after September 15, 1971, and is 20 feet wide or more, and the mobilehome does not comply with the health and safety standards provided in Sections 18550, 18552, and 18605 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations established thereunder, as determined following an inspection by the appropriate enforcement agency, as defined in Section 18207 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The mobilehome is more than 17 years old, or more than 25 years old if manufactured after September 15, 1971, and is less than 20 feet wide, and the mobilehome does not comply with the construction and safety standards under Sections 18550, 18552, and 18605 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations established thereunder, as determined following an inspection by the
 appropriate enforcement agency, as defined in Section 18207 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) It is in a significantly rundown condition or in disrepair, as determined by the general condition of the mobilehome and its acceptability to the health and safety of the occupants and to the public, exclusive of its age. The management shall use reasonable discretion in determining the general condition of the mobilehome and its accessory structures. The management shall bear the burden of demonstrating that the mobilehome is in a significantly rundown condition or in disrepair. The management of the park may not require repairs or improvements to the park space or property owned by the management, except for damage caused by the actions or negligence of the homeowner or an agent of the homeowner.

(e) The management shall not require a mobilehome to be removed from the park, pursuant to
 this section, unless the management has provided to the homeowner notice particularly specifying the condition that permits the removal of the mobilehome.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

798.73.5.

(a) In the case of a sale or transfer of a mobilehome that will remain in the park, the management may only require repairs or improvements to the mobilehome, its appurtenances, or an accessory structure that meet all of the following conditions:

(1) Except as provided by Section 798.83, the repair or improvement is to the mobilehome, its appurtenances, or an accessory structure that is not owned and installed by the management.

(2) The repair or improvement is based upon or is required by a local ordinance or state statute or regulation relating to mobilehomes, or a rule or regulation of the mobilehome park that implements
 or enforces a local ordinance or a state statute or regulation relating to mobilehomes.

(3) The repair or improvement relates to the exterior of the mobilehome, its appurtenances, or an accessory structure that is not owned and installed by the management.

(b) (1) The management, in the case of sale or transfer of a mobilehome that will remain in the park, shall provide a homeowner with a written summary of repairs or improvements that management requires to the mobilehome, its appurtenances, or an accessory structure that is not owned
 and installed by the management no later than 15 business days following the receipt of a request for this information, as part of the notice required by Section 798.59. This summary shall include specific references to park rules and regulations, local ordinances, and state statutes and regulations relating to mobilehomes upon which the request for repair or improvement is based.

(2) In the event that management fails or refuses to provide a homeowner a written summary of repairs and improvements required by paragraph (1), the management shall be deemed to have voluntarily waived any and all rights to require repairs or improvements to the mobilehome, its appurtenances, or an accessory structure, as a condition of the sale or transfer of a mobilehome, other than a repair or improvement that is required by local ordinances and statutes
 and regulations, due to, or based upon, health and safety.

(c) The provisions of this section enacted at the 1999–2000 Regular Session of the Legislature are declarative of existing law as they pertain to allowing park management to enforce park rules and regulations; these provisions specifically limit repairs and improvements that can be required of a homeowner by park management at the time of sale or transfer to the same repairs and improvements that can be required during any other time of a residency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   (AB 456)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

798.74.

(a) The management may require the right of prior approval of a prospective purchaser of a mobilehome that will remain in the park.

(b) (1) A selling homeowner or their agent shall give notice of a sale of a mobilehome that will remain in the park to management before the close of the sale.

(2) Management shall, within 15 days, provide the seller and the prospective purchaser both of the following, in writing, upon receiving the notice required in paragraph (1):

(A) The standards that management customarily utilizes to approve a tenancy
 application, including the minimum reported credit score from a consumer credit reporting agency that management requires for approval.

(B) A list of all documentation that management will require to determine if the prospective purchaser will qualify for tenancy in the park.

(c) Management shall not withhold approval from a prospective purchase of a mobilehome unless any of the following apply:

(1) Management reasonably determines that, based upon the purchaser’s prior tenancies, they will not comply with the rules and regulations of the park.

(2) The purchaser does not have the financial ability to pay the rent, estimated utilities, and other charges of the
 park.

(3) The purchaser has committed fraud, deceit, or concealment of material facts during the application process.

(d) In determining whether the prospective purchaser has the financial ability to pay the rent and charges of the park pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the management may require the prospective purchaser to document the amount and source of their gross monthly income or means of financial support. However, management shall not require the prospective purchaser to submit any of the following:

(1) Documentation beyond that disclosed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(2) Copies of any personal income
 tax returns.

(e) (1) Within 15 business days of receiving all of the information requested from the prospective purchaser, management shall notify the seller and the prospective purchaser, in writing, of either acceptance or rejection of the application. During this 15-day period, the prospective purchaser shall comply with management’s request, if any, for a personal interview.

(2) (A) If management rejects the application, management shall state the reason for the rejection in accordance with subdivision (c). If the rejection is based upon an alleged lack of financial ability to pay the rent, estimated utilities, and other charges of the park, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the prospective purchaser may elect to
 provide additional financial or asset information to management to demonstrate their financial ability to pay the rent, estimated utilities, and other charges of the park. For purposes of this paragraph, “additional financial information” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Savings accounts.

(ii) Certificates of deposit.

(iii) Stock portfolios.

(iv) Trust interests of which the purchaser is a beneficiary.

(v) Real property.

(vi) Similar financial assets that can be liquidated or sold.

(B) If the prospective purchaser elects to provide additional financial and asset information specified in subparagraph (A), management shall consider the information together with the prospective purchaser’s gross monthly income to determine whether the purchaser has the financial ability to pay the rent, estimated utilities, and other charges of the park.

(C) If a prospective purchaser provides additional financial and asset information, management may also consider any liabilities of the prospective purchaser when making a final determination of the prospective purchaser’s ability to pay the rent, estimated utilities, and other charges of the park under this subdivision.

(3) If the management fails or refuses to notify the seller and the prospective purchaser, in
 writing, of either acceptance or rejection of the application pursuant to paragraph (1), the management shall be deemed to have approved the application of the prospective purchaser.

(f) If the management collects a fee or charge from a prospective purchaser of a mobilehome in order to obtain a financial report or credit rating, the full amount of the fee or charge shall be credited toward payment of the first month’s rent for that mobilehome purchaser. If, for whatever reason, the prospective purchaser is rejected by the management, the management shall refund to the prospective purchaser the full amount of that fee or charge within 30 days from the date of rejection. If the prospective purchaser is approved by the management, but, for whatever reason, the prospective purchaser elects not to purchase the mobilehome, the management
 may retain the fee, or a portion thereof, to defray its administrative costs under this section.

(g) Management may be held liable by the selling homeowner for any and all damages proximately caused by management’s failure to comply with this section.

(h) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Charges” means all charges authorized and imposed by management under Section 798.31.

(2) “Consumer credit reporting agency” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1785.3.

(3) “Credit score” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section
 1785.15.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 59, Sec. 2.   (AB 456)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

798.74.4.

(a) The transfer or sale of a manufactured home or mobilehome in a mobilehome park is subject to the transfer disclosure requirements and provisions set forth in Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Civil Code. The requirements include, but are not limited to, the use of the Manufactured Home and Mobilehome Transfer Disclosure Statement set forth in Section 1102.6d of the Civil Code.

(b) In the case of a sale or transfer of a mobilehome that will remain in the park, upon written request, a homeowner shall provide a copy of the Manufactured Home and Mobilehome Transfer Disclosure Statement required by subdivision (a) to management.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 59, Sec. 3.   (AB 456)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

798.74.5.

(a) Within two business days of receiving a request from a prospective homeowner for an application for residency for a specific space within a mobilehome park, if the management has been advised that the mobilehome occupying that space is for sale, the management shall give the prospective homeowner a separate document in at least 12-point type entitled “INFORMATION FOR PROSPECTIVE HOMEOWNERS,” which includes the following statements:

 “As a prospective homeowner you are being provided with certain information you should know prior to applying for tenancy in a mobilehome park. This is not meant to be a complete list of information.

 Owning a home in a mobilehome park incorporates the dual role of “homeowner” (the owner of the home) and park resident or tenant (also called a “homeowner” in the Mobilehome Residency Law). As a homeowner under the Mobilehome Residency Law, you will be responsible for paying the amount necessary to rent the space for your home, in addition to other fees and charges described below. You must also follow certain rules and regulations to reside in the park.

 If you are approved for tenancy, and your tenancy commences within the next 30 days, your beginning monthly rent will be $____ (must be completed by the management) for space number ____ (must be completed by the management). Additional information regarding future rent or fee increases may also be provided.

 In addition to the monthly rent, you will be obligated to pay to the park the following additional fees and charges listed below. Other fees or charges may apply depending upon your specific requests. Metered utility charges are based on use.(Management shall describe the fee or charge and a good faith 
estimate of each fee or charge.)Some spaces are governed by an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that limits or restricts rents in mobilehome parks. These laws are commonly known as “rent control.” Prospective purchasers who do not occupy the mobilehome as their principal residence may be subject to rent levels which are not governed by these laws. (Civil Code Section 798.21) Long-term leases specify rent increases during the term of the lease. By signing a rental agreement or lease for a term of more than one year, you may be removing
 your rental space from a local rent control ordinance during the term, or any extension, of the lease if a local rent control ordinance is in effect for the area in which the space is located.

 A fully executed lease or rental agreement, or a statement signed by the park’s management and by you stating that you and the management have agreed to the terms and conditions of a rental agreement, is required to complete the sale or escrow process of the home. You have no rights to tenancy without a properly executed lease or agreement or that statement. (Civil Code Section 798.75)

 If the management collects a fee or charge from you in order to obtain a financial report or credit rating, the full amount of the fee or charge will be either credited toward your
 first month’s rent or, if you are rejected for any reason, refunded to you. However, if you are approved by management, but, for whatever reason, you elect not to purchase the mobilehome, the management may retain the fee to defray its administrative costs. (Civil Code Section 798.74)

 We encourage you to request from management a copy of the lease or rental agreement, the park’s rules and regulations, and a copy of the Mobilehome Residency Law. Upon request, park management will provide you a copy of each document. We urge you to read these documents before making the decision that you want to become a mobilehome park resident.Dated:
 Signature of Park Manager: Acknowledge Receipt by Prospective Homeowner: ”(b) Management shall provide a prospective homeowner, upon his or her request, with a copy of the rules and regulations of the park and with a copy of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 337, Sec. 1.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

798.75.

(a) An escrow, sale, or transfer agreement involving a mobilehome located in a park at the time of the sale, where the mobilehome is to remain in the park, shall contain a copy of either a fully executed rental agreement or a statement signed by the park’s management and the prospective homeowner that the parties have agreed to the terms and conditions of a rental agreement.

(b) In the event the purchaser fails to execute the rental agreement, the purchaser shall not have any rights of tenancy.

(c) In the event that an occupant of a mobilehome has no rights of tenancy and is not otherwise entitled to occupy the mobilehome pursuant
 to this chapter, the occupant is considered an unlawful occupant if, after a demand is made for the surrender of the mobilehome park site, for a period of five days, the occupant refuses to surrender the site to the mobilehome park management. In the event the unlawful occupant fails to comply with the demand, the unlawful occupant shall be subject to the proceedings set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) The occupant of the mobilehome shall not be considered an unlawful occupant and shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (c) if all of the following conditions are present:

(1) The occupant is the registered owner of the mobilehome.

(2) The
 management has done either of the following:

(A) Determined that the occupant has the financial ability to pay the rent and charges of the park; will comply with the rules and regulations of the park, based on the occupant’s prior tenancies; and will comply with this article.

(B) Failed or refused to timely notify the occupant of either acceptance or rejection of a tenancy application such that the occupant is deemed to have been approved for tenancy pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 798.74.

(3) The management failed or refused to offer the occupant a rental agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 59, Sec. 4.   (AB 456)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

798.75.5.

(a) The management shall provide a prospective homeowner with a completed written disclosure form concerning the park described in subdivision (b) at least three days prior to execution of a rental agreement or statement signed by the park management and the prospective homeowner that the parties have agreed to the terms and conditions of the rental agreement. The management shall update the information on the disclosure form annually, or, in the event of a material change in the
 condition of the mobilehome park, at the time of the material change in that condition.

(b) The written disclosure form shall read as follows:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Mobilehome Park Rental 
 Agreement Disclosure Form appears in the hard-copy publication of 
 the chaptered bill. See Sec. 1, Chapter 517, Statutes of 1999. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The Mobilehome Park Rental Agreement Disclosure Form appeared on pages 2 to 3 of Ch. 517 and now appears on pages 3383 to 3384 in Vol. 2 of the 1999 Statutes publication.)
-------------------------------------------

798.76.

The management may require that a prospective purchaser comply with any rule or regulation limiting residency based on age requirements for housing for older persons, provided that the rule or regulation complies with the federal Fair Housing Act, as amended by Public Law 104-76, and implementing regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   Effective June 10, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

798.77.

No rental or sale agreement shall contain a provision by which the purchaser or homeowner waives his or her rights under this chapter. Any such waiver shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 519, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

798.78.

(a) An heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a mobilehome in the mobilehome park through the death of the owner of the mobilehome who was a homeowner at the time of his or her death shall have the right to sell the mobilehome to a third party in accordance with the provisions of this article, but only if all the homeowner’s responsibilities and liabilities to the management regarding rent, utilities, and reasonable maintenance of the mobilehome and its premises which have arisen since the death of the homeowner have been satisfied as they
 have accrued pursuant to the rental agreement in effect at the time of the death of the homeowner up until the date the mobilehome is resold.

(b) In the event that the heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate does not satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) with respect to the satisfaction of the homeowner’s responsibilities and liabilities to the management which accrue pursuant to the rental agreement in effect at the time of the death of the homeowner, the management shall have the right to require the removal of the mobilehome from the park.

(c) Prior to the sale of a mobilehome by an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate, that individual may replace the existing mobilehome with another mobilehome, either new or used, or repair the existing mobilehome so that the mobilehome to be sold complies with health and safety standards
 provided in Sections 18550, 18552, and 18605 of the Health and Safety Code, and the regulations established thereunder. In the event the mobilehome is to be replaced, the replacement mobilehome shall also meet current standards of the park as contained in the park’s most recent written requirements issued to prospective homeowners.

(d) In the event the heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate desires to establish a tenancy in the park, that individual shall comply with those provisions of this article which identify the requirements for a prospective purchaser of a mobilehome that remains in the park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 745, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

798.79.

(a) Any legal owner or junior lienholder who forecloses on his or her security interest in a mobilehome located in a mobilehome park shall have the right to sell the mobilehome within the park to a third party in accordance with this article, but only if all of the homeowner’s responsibilities and liabilities to the management regarding rent, utilities, and reasonable maintenance of a mobilehome and its premises are satisfied by the foreclosing creditor as they accrue through the date the mobilehome is resold. 

(b) In
 the event the legal owner or junior lienholder has received from the management a copy of the notice of termination of tenancy for nonpayment of rent or other charges, the foreclosing creditor’s right to sell the mobilehome within the park to a third party shall also be governed by Section 798.56a.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 190, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

798.80.

(a) Not less than 30 days nor more than one year prior to an owner of a mobilehome park entering into a written listing agreement with a licensed real estate broker, as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 10130) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, for the sale of the park, or offering to sell the park to any party, the owner shall provide written notice of his or her intention to sell the mobilehome park by first-class mail or by personal delivery to the president, secretary, and
 treasurer of any resident organization formed by homeowners in the mobilehome park as a nonprofit corporation, pursuant to Section 23701v of the Revenue and Taxation Code, stock cooperative corporation, or other entity for purposes of converting the mobilehome park to condominium or stock cooperative ownership interests and for purchasing the mobilehome park from the management of the mobilehome park. An offer to sell a park shall not be construed as an offer under this subdivision unless it is initiated by the park owner or agent.

(b) An owner of a mobilehome park shall not be required to comply with subdivision (a) unless the following conditions are met:

(1) The resident organization has first furnished the park owner or park manager a written notice of the name and address of the president, secretary, and treasurer of the resident organization to whom the notice of sale shall
 be given. 

(2) The resident organization has first notified the park owner or manager in writing that the park residents are interested in purchasing the park. The initial notice by the resident organization shall be made prior to a written listing or offer to sell the park by the park owner, and the resident organization shall give subsequent notice once each year thereafter that the park residents are interested in purchasing the park.

(3) The resident organization has furnished the park owner or park manager a written notice, within five days, of any change in the name or address of the officers of the resident organization to whom the notice of sale shall be given.

(c) Nothing in this section affects the validity of title to real property transferred in violation of this section, although a violation shall
 subject the seller to civil action pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 798.84) by homeowner residents of the park or the resident organization.

(d) Nothing in this section affects the ability of a licensed real estate broker, as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 10130) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, to collect a commission pursuant to an executed contract between the broker and the mobilehome park owner.

(e) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any sale or other transfer by a park owner who is a natural person to any relation specified in Section 6401 or 6402 of the Probate Code.

(2) Any transfer by gift, devise, or operation of law.

(3) Any transfer by a corporation to an affiliate. As used in this paragraph, “affiliate” means any shareholder of the transferring corporation, any corporation or entity owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the transferring corporation, or any other corporation or entity controlled, directly or indirectly, by any shareholder of the transferring corporation.

(4) Any transfer by a partnership to any of its partners.

(5) Any conveyance resulting from the judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust encumbering a mobilehome park or any deed given in lieu of such a foreclosure.

(6) Any sale or transfer between or among joint tenants or tenants in common owning a mobilehome park.

(7) The purchase of a mobilehome park by a governmental entity under its powers of eminent domain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

798.81.

The management (1) shall not prohibit the listing or sale of a used mobilehome within the park by the homeowner, an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a mobilehome in the mobilehome park through the death of the owner of the mobilehome who was a homeowner at the time of his or her death, or the agent of any such person other than the management, (2) nor require the selling homeowner to authorize the management to act as the agent in the sale of a mobilehome as a condition of approval of the buyer or prospective homeowner for residency in the
 park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 745, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

798.82.

The management, at the time of an application for residency, shall disclose in writing to any person who proposes to purchase or install a manufactured home or mobilehome on a space, on which the construction of the pad or foundation system commenced after September 1, 1986, and no other manufactured home or mobilehome was previously located, installed, or occupied, that the manufactured home or mobilehome may be subject to a school facilities fee under Sections 53080 and 53080.4 of, and Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 65995) of Division 1 of Title 7
 of, the Government Code.
